Utah statutes.
13-49-403.   Action by attorney general or district or county attorney.

(1)  Upon referral from the division, the attorney general or any district or county attorney may:

(a)  bring an action for temporary or permanent injunctive or other relief in any court of competent jurisdiction for any violation of this part;

(b)  bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the collection of penalties authorized under Subsection 13-49-402(2); or

(c)  bring an action under Subsection 13-49-402(4).

(2)  A court may, upon entry of final judgment, award restitution when appropriate to any person suffering loss because of a violation of this part if proof of loss is submitted to the satisfaction of the court.

